Massachusetts, session 194th, S2943.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new subsection:-
(n) i.) The Massachusetts commission against discrimination shall notify the state
secretary of any determination that a person, organization or other entity adjudicated to have
engaged in an unlawful practice under section 4 of chapter 151B;
ii.) The state secretary shall disqualify any person, organization or other entity that has
been determined by the commission to have violated Section 4 of chapter 151B for a period of 4
years. The commission shall establish an adjudicatory process to receive and review complaints
of such discrimination.
SECTION 2. Subsection (m) of Section 45 of Chapter 3 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding after the word “268A” the
of 2

following words:- “or violations of sections 1341, 1343, 1346, or 1951 of title 18 of the United
States Code.”
of 2